Hawaii, session 2026, GM1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the affordable
housing crisis continues to be one of the State's most
significant and challenging social problems and is a critical
issue for many Hawaii residents. As the cost of housing
continues to rise, the State must assist residents in finding
methods of increasing the availability of homeownership. Saving
for a down payment on a home loan continues to be a barrier for
many Hawaii residents with few programs available to assist in
this endeavor.
The legislature further finds that contributions to the
first-time home buyer savings account will reduce taxable
income. This incentivizes first time home ownership through
saving for a down payment and closing costs.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to increase the
maximum annual deduction for contributions into, and maximum
account levels for, individual housing accounts, to reflect
current housing prices more accurately.
2026-2350 SB2552 GDI SMA-l.docx 1
iiiiiiiiiniiniinnimiiiniHiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 235-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (a) and (b) to read:
"(a) There shall be allowed as a deduction from gross
income the amount, not to exceed [^5,-&QQ/ ] $20,000, paid in cash
during the taxable year by an individual taxpayer to an
individual housing account established for the individual's
benefit to provide funding for the purchase of the individual's
first principal residence. A deduction not to exceed [$10,000]
$40, 000 shall be allowed for a married couple filing a joint
return. No deduction shall be allowed on any amounts
distributed less than three hundred sixty-five days from the
date on which a contribution is made to the account. Any
deduction claimed for a previous taxable year for amounts
distributed less than three hundred sixty-five days from the
date on which a contribution was made shall be disallowed and
the amount deducted shall be included in the previous taxable
year's gross income and the tax reassessed. The interest paid
or accrued within the taxable year on the account shall not be
included in the individual's gross income. For purposes of this
section, [the-^feejffft] "first principal residence" means a
2026-2350 SB2552 GDI SMA-l.docx
iiMiiiniiiiiiiininiMiiNiii

Page 3 2552
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
residential property purchased with the payment or distribution
from the individual housing account^ which shall be owned and
occupied as the only home by an individual who did not have any
interest in, individually, or whose spouse did not have any
interest in, if the individual is married, a residential
property within the last five years of opening the individual
housing account.
In the case of a married couple filing separate returns,
the sum of the deductions allowable to each of them for the
taxable year shall not exceed [■$-S-r&007-] $20,000, or [$10,000]
$40,000 for a joint return, for amounts paid in cash, excluding
interest paid or accrued thereon.
The amounts paid in cash allowable as a deduction under
this section to an individual for all taxable years shall not
exceed [$25,000,] $200,000, excluding interest paid or accrued.
In the case of married individuals having separate individual
housing accounts, the sum of the separate accounts and the
deduction under this section shall not exceed [$25/000,]
$200,000, excluding interest paid or accrued thereon.
(b) For purposes of this section, [-the—teem] "individual
housing account" means a trust created or organized in Hawaii
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiioiiiiiiiigniH

Page 4 S.B. NO. 2^1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
for the exclusive benefit of an individual, or, in the case of a
married individual, for the exclusive benefit of the individual
and spouse jointly, but only if the written governing instrument
creating the trust meets the following requirements:
(1) Contributions shall not be accepted for the taxable
year in excess of [$5,000] $20,000 (or
$40,000 in the case of a joint return) or in excess of
$200,000 for all taxable years, exclusive of
interest paid or accrued;
(2) The trustee is a bank, a savings and loan association,
a credit union, or a depository financial services
loan company, chartered, licensed, or supervised under
federal or state law, whose accounts are insured by
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the
National Credit Union Administration, or any agency of
[thio] the State or any federal agency established for
the purpose of insuring accounts in these financial
institutions. The financial institution [must] shall
actively make residential real estate mortgage loans
in Hawaii;
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx
lllliUHIHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIinill

Page 5
S.B. NO. -
C.D. 1
(3) The assets of the trust shall be invested only in
fully insured savings or time deposits. Funds held in
the trust may be commingled for purposes of
investment, but individual records shall be maintained
by the trustee for each individual housing account
holder that show all transactions in detail;
(4) The entire interest of an individual or married couple
for whose benefit the trust is maintained shall be
distributed to the individual or married couple [ftefe]
no later than one hundred twenty months after the date
on which the first contribution is made to the trust;
(5) Except as provided in subsection (g) , the trustee
shall not distribute the funds in the account unless
the trustee:
(A) Verifies that the money is to be used for the
purchase of a first principal residence located
in Hawaii, and provides that the instrument of
payment is payable to the mortgagor, construction
contractor, or other vendor of the property
purchased; or
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 5
liiiiiHiiiiliiiiinniiinMin

Page 6
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
(B) Withholds an amount equal to ten per cent of the
amount withdrawn from the account and remits this
amount to the director within ten days after the
date of the withdrawal. The amount withheld
shall be applied to the liability of the taxpayer
under subsections (c) and (e); and
(6) If any amounts are distributed before the expiration
of three hundred sixty-five days from the date on
which a contribution is made to the account, the
trustee shall [ee] notify in writing the taxpayer and
the director. If the trustee makes the verification
required in paragraph (5)(A), then the department
shall disallow the deduction under subsection (a) and
subsections (c), (e), and (f) shall not apply to that
amount. If the trustee withholds an amount under
paragraph (5){B), then the department shall disallow
the deduction under subsection (a) and subsection (e)
shall apply, but subsection (c) shall not apply."
2. By amending subsections (f) and (g) to read:
"(f) If the individual for whose benefit the individual
housing account was established purchases a residential property
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 6
iiiiiiMiiiiniiniwHiMiiiii

Page 7
S.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
in Hawaii with the distribution from the individual housing
account [-5-
-H-)- Before January 1,—1990,—and if the individual oello in
any manner or method or by aoe—ef—any inatrument
convoying or tranoforri-ftg the residential property/
t^=ie—grees—ifteeme—ef——individual under this chapter
for the taxable year in- which the residential property
i-5--sold7—conveyed,—er—transferred/—whichever is
applicable/—oha-11 ■inclttdo an amount equal to the
amount of the distribution from the individual housing
account,—a-nd in addition,—the—grees—ineeme—of—the
fee—irfteroosed-^y—Ofi—omouftt—eguof—to
ten—per^-eefttr-of—fefee—tofeoi—diotrifeutiofi—from—tfee
individual housing account,*—or
4-34- After—©eeemfeer—3i7—1-9B-9-] , the individual shall report
one-tenth of the total distribution from the
individual housing account used to purchase the
residential property as gross income in the taxable
year in which the distribution is completed and in
each taxable year thereafter until all of the
distribution has been included in the individual's
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 7

Page 8
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
gross income at the end of the tenth taxable year
after the purchase of the residential property. If
the individual sells in any manner or method or by use
of any instrument conveying or transferring the
residential property, the gross income of the
individual under this chapter for the taxable year in
which the residential property is sold, conveyed, or
transferred, whichever is applicable, shall include an
amount equal to the amount of the distribution from
the individual housing account not previously reported
as gross income, and in addition, the tax liability of
the individual shall be increased by an amount equal
to ten per cent of the total distribution from the
individual housing account. If the individual sells
the residential property in any manner as provided in
this [pa-regraph] subsection after all of the
distribution has been included in the individual's
gross income at the end of the tenth taxable year
after the purchase of the residential property, the
tax liability of the individual shall not be increased
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 8
iwiiiiiiiiinininiiiiiiiiiii

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
by an amount equal to ten per cent of the total
distribution from the individual housing account.
[An individual who purchaocd a reoidentia-1 propcety-i-n Hawaii
with thG-diotribtttion from an individual houoing account before
January 1/—1990,—who is- subj-eet to paragraph—(4-}—may cloetMjo
as-^i^wided—pa^fdef^aph—{-2-H The election shall be made
before January 1,—1991.--If the individual--makco the election,
the individual shall report one-tenth of tho total--distribution
from the individual houoing account as gross income in the
taxable year in which tho election occurs and in each toKable
yea^f—hhe^5ea^ber—aftdi-b-aii—e^-^fehe—dirabribabioft—has-^aeofi—iaeiaded
ifi—g^fe&s-drfteeme—as—paev-ided—by—paaapaaph—(-bH-- If the individual
mabiag—bhe—ebesbiofi—seiis—febe—resideftbia-1—pseperby—in—aay—maftfies
as provided in paragraph—[-3-H—then the individual shall inel-udc
as iaeome—tho amount of—the—distribution—not previously ■reported
as income--and inereaso the individual’s tax liability as
provided—ia—the—seeend—seabeaee—at—parag^?aph—(-24-7—except—when
the-'third--scntcnco at—paragraph—(-24—applies.
ba—the—abberaabivaT—any individual subject to parag-raph—(-24-
who ostabliohcd the individual housiag account before January 1,
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 9
iHiiiiiMimiiiniBiniiHiiMii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
1990/—may -eloGt within one year after the date of purchase,—fee
fee—sufe^-eet-^fee—per^^eeph—(1) . ]
(g) No tax liability shall be imposed under this section
if:
(1) The payment or distribution is attributable to the
individual dying or becoming totally disabled; or
(2) Residential property subject to subsection (f) is
transferred by will or by operation of law or sold due
to the death or total disability of an individual or
individual’s spouse,
subject to the following:
An individual shall not be considered to be totally
disabled unless proof is furnished of the total disability [ift
the--form ■and as-^fefee—direefees—may require] .
Upon the death of an individual for whose benefit an
individual housing account has been established, the funds in
the account shall be payable to the estate of the individual;
provided that if the account was held jointly by the decedent
and a spouse of the decedent, the account shall terminate and be
paid to the surviving spouse; or, if the surviving spouse [se]
elects, the spouse may continue the account as an individual
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
UMIIIIIIIIIIIIIHnilllilMI

Page 11 2552
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
housing account. Upon the total disability of an individual for
whose benefit an individual housing account has been
established, the individual or the individual's authorized
representative may elect to continue the account or terminate
the account and be paid the assets; provided that if the account
was held jointly by a totally disabled person and a spouse of
that person, then the spouse or an authorized representative may
elect to continue the account or terminate the account and be
paid the assets."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval,
and shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31,
2026.
2026-2350 SB2552 CDl SMA-l.docx
Miiiinniniiiiiiiiiiiim

2552
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAIM

S.B. No. 2552, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026,
Tesident of the Sen^
Clerk of the Senate
111-26

SB No. 2552, SD 1, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
—
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives